District of Columbia statutes.
31-3153

Judicial review; mandamus.

(a)

Any carrier aggrieved by any act, determination, rule, regulation, or order or any other action of the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter, and which was the subject of a contested case, may appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, in accordance with § 2-510.

(b)

The filing of an appeal pursuant to this section shall not stay the application of any rule, regulation, order, or other action of the Commissioner to the appealing party unless the court, after giving the appealing party notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines that failure to grant the stay would be detrimental to the interest of policyholders, shareholders, creditors, or the public.

(c)

Any carrier aggrieved by any failure of the Commissioner to act or make a determination required by this chapter may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for a writ in the nature of a mandamus or a peremptory mandamus directing the Commissioner to act or make the determination forthwith.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-328, § 4, 52 DCR 1459